Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1111.02
Licensed dental hygienist, defined.

Licensed dental hygienist means a person who holds a license to practice dental hygiene under the Dentistry Practice Act.

Laws 2017, LB18, § 7.